Illinois, session 104th, SB1346.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Managed Care Reform and Patient Rights Act 5is amended by changing Sections 15 and 90 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 134/15)7    Sec. 15. Provision of information. 8    (a) A health care plan shall provide annually to enrollees 9and prospective enrollees, upon request, a complete list of 10participating health care providers in the health care plan's 11service area and a description of the following terms of 12coverage:13        (1) the service area;14        (2) the covered benefits and services with all 15    exclusions, exceptions, and limitations;16        (3) the pre-certification and other utilization review 17    procedures and requirements;18        (4) a description of the process for the selection of 19    a primary care physician, any limitation on access to 20    specialists, and the plan's standing referral policy;21        (5) the emergency coverage and benefits, including any 22    restrictions on emergency care services;23        (6) the out-of-area coverage and benefits, if any;  SB1346 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 07692 BAB 17736 b1        (7) the enrollee's financial responsibility for 2    copayments, deductibles, premiums, and any other 3    out-of-pocket expenses;4        (8) the provisions for continuity of treatment in the 5    event a health care provider's participation terminates 6    during the course of an enrollee's treatment by that 7    provider;8        (9) the appeals process, forms, and time frames for 9    health care services appeals, complaints, and external 10    independent reviews, administrative complaints, and 11    utilization review complaints, including a phone number to 12    call to receive more information from the health care plan 13    concerning the appeals process; and14        (10) a statement of all basic health care services and 15    all specific benefits and services mandated to be provided 16    to enrollees by any State law or administrative rule, 17    highlighting any newly enacted State law or administrative 18    rule, must be provided annually to enrollees. This 19    requirement can be fulfilled by providing enrollees the 20    most up-to-date accident and health checklist submitted to 21    the Department, reflecting statutory health care coverage 22    compliance by the health care plan. The requirement to 23    highlight any newly enacted State laws or administrative 24    rules does not apply to plans for beneficiaries of 25    Medicaid. 26    (a-5) Without limiting the generality of subsection (a) of   SB1346 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 07692 BAB 17736 b1this Section, no qualified health plans shall be offered for 2sale directly to consumers through the health insurance 3marketplace operating in the State in accordance with Sections 41311 and 1321 of the federal Patient Protection and Affordable 5Care Act (Public Law 111-148), as amended by the federal 6Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public 7Law 111-152), and any amendments thereto, or regulations or 8guidance issued thereunder (collectively, "the Federal Act"), 9unless, in addition to the information required under 10subsection (a) of this Section, the following information is 11available to the consumer at the time he or she is comparing 12health care plans and their premiums: 13        (1) With respect to prescription drug benefits, the 14    most recently published formulary where a consumer can 15    view in one location covered prescription drugs; 16    information on tiering and the cost-sharing structure for 17    each tier; and information about how a consumer can obtain 18    specific copayment amounts or coinsurance percentages for 19    a specific qualified health plan before enrolling in that 20    plan. This information shall clearly identify the 21    qualified health plan to which it applies.22        (2) The most recently published provider directory 23    where a consumer can view the provider network that 24    applies to each qualified health plan and information 25    about each provider, including location, contact 26    information, specialty, medical group, if any, any   SB1346 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 07692 BAB 17736 b1    institutional affiliation, and whether the provider is 2    accepting new patients. The information shall clearly 3    identify the qualified health plan to which it applies.4    In the event of an inconsistency between any separate 5written disclosure statement and the enrollee contract or 6certificate, the terms of the enrollee contract or certificate 7shall control. 8    (b) Upon written request, a health care plan shall provide 9to enrollees a description of the financial relationships 10between the health care plan and any health care provider and, 11if requested, the percentage of copayments, deductibles, and 12total premiums spent on healthcare related expenses and the 13percentage of copayments, deductibles, and total premiums 14spent on other expenses, including administrative expenses, 15except that no health care plan shall be required to disclose 16specific provider reimbursement.17    (c) A participating health care provider shall provide all 18of the following, where applicable, to enrollees upon request:19        (1) Information related to the health care provider's 20    educational background, experience, training, specialty, 21    and board certification, if applicable.22        (2) The names of licensed facilities on the provider 23    panel where the health care provider presently has 24    privileges for the treatment, illness, or procedure that 25    is the subject of the request.26        (3) Information regarding the health care provider's   SB1346 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 07692 BAB 17736 b1    participation in continuing education programs and 2    compliance with any licensure, certification, or 3    registration requirements, if applicable.4    (d) A health care plan shall provide the information 5required to be disclosed under this Act upon enrollment and 6annually thereafter in a legible and understandable format. 7The Department shall promulgate rules to establish the format 8based, to the extent practical, on the standards developed for 9supplemental insurance coverage under Title XVIII of the 10federal Social Security Act as a guide, so that a person can 11compare the attributes of the various health care plans.12    (e) The written disclosure requirements of this Section 13may be met by disclosure to one enrollee in a household.14    (f) Each issuer of qualified health plans for sale 15directly to consumers through the health insurance marketplace 16operating in the State shall make the information described in 17subsection (a) of this Section, for each qualified health plan 18that it offers, available and accessible to the general public 19on the company's Internet website and through other means for 20individuals without access to the Internet.21    (g) The Department shall ensure that State-operated 22Internet websites, in addition to the Internet website for the 23health insurance marketplace established in this State in 24accordance with the Federal Act and its implementing 25regulations, prominently provide links to Internet-based 26materials and tools to help consumers be informed purchasers   SB1346 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 07692 BAB 17736 b1of health care plans.2    (h) Nothing in this Section shall be interpreted or 3implemented in a manner not consistent with the Federal Act. 4This Section shall apply to all qualified health plans offered 5for sale directly to consumers through the health insurance 6marketplace operating in this State for any coverage year 7beginning on or after January 1, 2015. 8(Source: P.A. 103-154, eff. 6-30-23.) 9    (215 ILCS 134/90)10    Sec. 90. Office of Consumer Health Insurance. 11    (a) The Director of Insurance shall establish the Office 12of Consumer Health Insurance within the Department of 13Insurance to provide assistance and information to all health 14care consumers within the State. Within the appropriation 15allocated, the Office shall provide information and assistance 16to all health care consumers by: 17        (1) assisting consumers in understanding health 18    insurance marketing materials and the coverage provisions 19    of individual plans; 20        (2) educating enrollees about their rights within 21    individual plans; 22        (3) assisting enrollees with the process of filing 23    formal grievances and appeals; 24        (4) establishing and operating a toll-free "800" 25    telephone number line to handle consumer inquiries;   SB1346 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 07692 BAB 17736 b1        (5) making related information available in languages 2    other than English that are spoken as a primary language 3    by a significant portion of the State's population, as 4    determined by the Department; 5        (6) analyzing, commenting on, monitoring, and making 6    publicly available an annual report, posted in a prominent 7    location on the Department's publicly accessible website, 8    reports on the development and implementation of federal, 9    State, and local laws, regulations, and other governmental 10    policies and actions that pertain to the adequacy of 11    health care plans, facilities, and services in the State 12    and, beginning January 31, 2027, the annual report shall 13    also include a summary of all State health insurance 14    benefit related legislation enacted in the prior calendar 15    year that includes, at minimum, a link to the Public Act, 16    the statutory citation, the subject, a brief summary, and 17    the effective date; 18        (7) filing an annual report with the Governor, the 19    Director, and the General Assembly, which shall contain 20    recommendations for improvement of the regulation of 21    health insurance plans, including recommendations on 22    improving health care consumer assistance and patterns, 23    abuses, and progress that it has identified from its 24    interaction with health care consumers; and 25        (8) performing all duties assigned to the Office by 26    the Director.  SB1346 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 07692 BAB 17736 b1    (a-5) The report required under paragraph (6) of 2subsection (a) shall be posted by January 31, 2026 and each 3January 31 thereafter on the Department's publicly accessible 4website. 5    (b) The report required under paragraph (7) of subsection 6(a) subsection (a)(7) shall be filed and posted by January 31, 72026 January 31, 2001 and each January 31 thereafter on the 8Department's publicly accessible website.9    (c) Nothing in this Section shall be interpreted to 10authorize access to or disclosure of individual patient or 11health care professional or provider records.12(Source: P.A. 91-617, eff. 1-1-00.) 13    Section 10. The Uniform Health Care Service Benefits 14Information Card Act is amended by changing Section 15 as 15follows: 16    (215 ILCS 139/15)17    Sec. 15. Uniform health care benefit information cards 18required. 19    (a) A health benefit plan, health benefit plan offering 20dental coverage, or a dental plan that issues a physical or 21electronic card or other technology and provides coverage for 22health care services including prescription drugs or devices 23also referred to as health care benefits and an administrator 24of such a plan including, but not limited to, third-party   SB1346 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 07692 BAB 17736 b1administrators for self-insured plans and state-administered 2plans shall issue to its insureds a card or other technology 3containing uniform health care benefit information. The health 4care benefit information physical card, electronic card, and 5or other technology shall specifically identify and display 6the following mandatory data elements on the physical and 7electronic cards card:8        (1) processor control number, if required for claims 9    adjudication;10        (2) group number;11        (3) card issuer identifier;12        (4) cardholder ID number;13        (5) (blank); except for dental plans, the regulatory 14    entity that holds authority over the plan; for the purpose 15    of this requirement, the Department of Healthcare and 16    Family Services is the regulatory entity that holds 17    authority over plans that the Department of Healthcare and 18    Family Services has contracted with to provide services 19    under the medical assistance program;20        (6) except for dental plans, any deductible applicable 21    to the plan; 22        (7) except for dental plans, any out-of-pocket maximum 23    limitation applicable to the plan; 24        (8) a toll-free telephone number and Internet website 25    address through which the cardholder may seek consumer 26    assistance information, such as up-to-date lists of   SB1346 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 07692 BAB 17736 b1    preferred providers, including health care professionals, 2    hospitals, and other facilities, offices, or sites that 3    are contracted to furnish items or services under the 4    plan, and additional information about the plan; and 5        (9) cardholder name.6    (b) The uniform health care benefit information physical 7card, electronic card, and or other technology shall 8specifically identify and display the following mandatory data 9elements on the back of the card:10        (1) claims submission names and addresses; and11        (2) help desk telephone numbers and names; and .12        (3) (b-5) A uniform health care benefit information 13    card or other technology for a health benefit plan 14    offering dental coverage or dental plan shall include a 15    statement indicating whether the health benefit plan 16    offering dental coverage or dental plan is self-insured or 17    fully funded and if the plan is subject to regulation by 18    the Department of Insurance. For the purpose of this 19    requirement, the Department of Healthcare and Family 20    Services is the regulatory entity that holds authority 21    over plans that the Department of Healthcare and Family 22    Services has contracted with to provide services under the 23    medical assistance program. 24    (c) A new uniform health care benefit information physical 25card, electronic card, and or other technology shall be issued 26by a health benefit plan or dental plan upon enrollment and   SB1346 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 07692 BAB 17736 b1reissued upon any change in the insured's coverage that 2affects mandatory data elements contained on the card.3    (d) Notwithstanding subsections (a), (b), and (c) of this 4Section, a discounted health care services plan administrator 5shall issue to its beneficiaries a card containing the 6following mandatory data elements:7        (1) an Internet website for beneficiaries to access 8    up-to-date lists of preferred providers;9        (2) a toll-free help desk number for beneficiaries and 10    providers to access up-to-date lists of preferred 11    providers and additional information about the discounted 12    health care services plan;13        (3) the name or logo of the provider network;14        (4) a group number, if necessary for the processing of 15    benefits; 16        (5) a cardholder ID number;17        (6) the cardholder's name or a space to permit the 18    cardholder to print his or her name, if the cardholder 19    pays a periodic charge for use of the card; 20        (7) a processor control number, if required for claims 21    adjudication; and 22        (8) a statement that the plan is not insurance.23    (e) As used in this Section, "discounted health care 24services plan administrator" means any person, partnership, or 25corporation, other than an insurer, health service 26corporation, limited health service organization holding a   SB1346 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 07692 BAB 17736 b1certificate of authority under the Limited Health Service 2Organization Act, or health maintenance organization holding a 3certificate of authority under the Health Maintenance 4Organization Act that arranges, contracts with, or administers 5contracts with a provider whereby insureds or beneficiaries 6are provided an incentive to use health care services provided 7by health care services providers under a discounted health 8care services plan in which there are no other incentives, 9such as copayment, coinsurance, or any other reimbursement 10differential, for beneficiaries to utilize the provider. 11"Discounted health care services plan administrator" also 12includes any person, partnership, or corporation, other than 13an insurer, health service corporation, limited health service 14organization holding a certificate of authority under the 15Limited Health Service Organization Act, or health maintenance 16organization holding a certificate of authority under the 17Health Maintenance Organization Act that enters into a 18contract with another administrator to enroll beneficiaries or 19insureds in a preferred provider program marketed as an 20independently identifiable program based on marketing 21materials or member benefit identification cards. 22(Source: P.A. 102-902, eff. 1-1-24.)